Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.57
Centralization and coordination of real property; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to centralize and coordinate the real property resources owned and leased by the state. Currently many state buildings are left vacant by agencies as new leases are signed and agencies' missions change. Without centralized authority and expertise to allocate, maintain, and renovate current buildings, the state will continue to lease more space from outside sources, thus increasing state expenditures. To facilitate the goal of centralized authority, the changes proposed by Laws 1992, LB 1241, are required.

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 1.